Idaho, session 2025, S1024.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 16-2403, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
16-2403. DEFINITIONS. As used in this chapter:


(1) "Child" means an individual less than eighteen (18) years of age and
not emancipated by either marriage or legal proceeding.
(2) "Consistent with the least restrictive alternative principle"
means that services are delivered in the setting that places the fewest
restrictions on the personal liberty of the child and that provides the
greatest integration with individuals who do not have disabilities, in typi-
cal and age-appropriate school, community and family environments, which is
consistent with safe, effective and cost-effective treatment for the child
and family.
(3) "Department" means the department of health and welfare.
(4) "Designated examiner" means a psychiatrist, psychologist, psychi-
atric nurse, or social worker and such other mental health professionals as
may be designated in accordance with rules promulgated pursuant to the pro-
visions of chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code, by the department of health and
welfare. Any person designated by the department director will be specially
qualified by training and experience in the diagnosis and treatment of men-
tal or mentally related illnesses or conditions.
(5) "Director" means the director of the state department of health and
welfare.
(6) "Eligibility screening" means the collection and review of infor-
mation directly related to the applicant's mental health and level of func-
tioning that the department uses to determine whether an applicant is eligi-
ble for children's mental health services available through the department.
(6) (7) "Emergency" means a situation in which the child's condition,
as evidenced by recent behavior, poses a significant threat to the health or
safety of the child, his family or others, or poses a serious risk of sub-
stantial deterioration in the child's condition which cannot be eliminated
by the use of supportive services or intervention by the child's parents, or
mental health professionals, and treatment in the community while the child
remains in his family home.
(7) (8) "Informed consent to treatment" means a knowing and voluntary
decision to undergo a specific course of treatment, evidenced in writing,
and made by an emancipated child, or a child's parent, or guardian, who has
the capacity to make an informed decision, after the staff of the facility or
other provider of treatment has explained the nature and effects of the pro-
posed treatment.
(8) (9) "Involuntary treatment" means treatment, services and place-
ment of children provided without consent of the parent of a child, under the
authority of a court order obtained pursuant to this chapter, as directed by
an order of disposition issued by a designated employee of the department of
health and welfare under section 16-2415, Idaho Code.
(9) (10) "Lacks capacity to make an informed decision concerning treat-
ment" means that the parent is unable to understand the nature and effects
of hospitalization or treatment, or is unable to engage in a rational de-
cision-making process regarding such hospitalization or treatment, as ev-
idenced by an inability to weigh the risks and benefits, despite conscien-
tious efforts to explain them in terms that the parent can understand.
(10) (11) "Likely to cause harm to himself or to suffer substantial men-
tal or physical deterioration" means that, as evidenced by recent behavior,
the child:


(a) Is likely in the near future to inflict substantial physical injury
upon himself;
(b) Is likely to suffer significant deprivation of basic needs such as
food, clothing, shelter, health or safety; or
(c) Will suffer a substantial increase or persistence of symptoms of
mental illness or serious emotional disturbance which is likely to re-
sult in an inability to function in the community without risk to his
safety or well-being or the safety or well-being of others, and which
cannot be treated adequately with available home and community-based
outpatient services.
(11) (12) "Likely to cause harm to others" means that, as evidenced by
recent behavior causing, attempting, or threatening such harm with the ap-
parent ability to complete the act, a child is likely to cause physical in-
jury or physical abuse to another person.
(13) "Parent" means a person who, by birth or through adoption, is con-
sidered legally responsible for a child. The term "guardian" is not included
in the definition of parent.
(12) (14) "Protection and advocacy system" means the agency designated
by the governor as the state protection and advocacy system pursuant to 42
U.S.C. 6042 and 42 U.S.C. 10801 et seq.
(13) (15) "Serious emotional disturbance" means a diagnostic and
statistical manual of mental disorders (DSM) diagnosable mental health,
emotional or behavioral disorder, or a neuropsychiatric condition which
results in a serious disability, and which requires sustained treatment in-
terventions, and causes the child's functioning to be impaired in thought,
perception, affect or behavior. A disorder shall be considered to "result in
a serious disability" if it causes substantial impairment of functioning in
family, school or community that is measured by and documented through the
use of a standardized instrument approved by the department and conducted or
supervised by a qualified clinician. A substance abuse disorder does not, by
itself, constitute a serious emotional disturbance, although it may coexist
with serious emotional disturbance.
(14) (16) "Special therapy" means any treatment modality used to treat
children with serious emotional disturbances which is subject to restric-
tions or special conditions imposed by the department of health and welfare
rules.
(15) (17) "Surrogate parent" means any person appointed to act in the
place of the parent of a child for purposes of developing an individual edu-
cation program under the authority of the individuals with disabilities edu-
cation act, 20 U.S.C. 1400 et seq., as amended.
(16) (18) "Teens at risk" means individuals attending Idaho secondary
public schools who have been identified as expressing or exhibiting indi-
cations of depression, suicidal inclination, emotional trauma, substance
abuse or other behaviors or symptoms that indicate the existence of, or that
may lead to, the development of mental illness or substance abuse.
(17) (19) "Treatment facility" means a facility or program meeting ap-
plicable licensing standards that has been approved for the provisions of
services under this chapter by the department of health and welfare.


SECTION 2. That Chapter 24, Title 16, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 16-2406A, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
16-2406A. DETERMINATION OF ELIGIBILITY FOR MENTAL HEALTH SER-
VICES. (1) Individuals may access children's mental health services admin-
istered by the department through an eligibility screening. The eligibility
screening must be directly related to the individual's mental illness and
level of functioning and must be based on the eligibility criteria described
in this section.
(2) The total number of children who are eligible for mental health ser-
vices shall be established by the department. The department may, in its
sole discretion, limit or prioritize mental health services, define eligi-
bility criteria, or establish the number of persons eligible based on such
factors as court-ordered services, availability of funding, the degree of
financial need, or the degree of clinical need.
(3) To be eligible for voluntary children's mental health services, the
individual must:
(a) Be under eighteen (18) years of age;
(b) Reside within the state of Idaho;
(c) Have a DSM-5-TR mental health diagnosis. A substance use disorder
alone or a developmental disorder alone does not constitute an eligible
mental health diagnosis, although one (1) or more of these conditions
may coexist with an eligible mental health diagnosis; and
(d) Have a substantial functional impairment as assessed by using the
department's approved tool.
SECTION 3. That Section 39-302, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-302. DEFINITIONS. As used in this chapter, the terms defined in
this section shall have the following meanings, unless the context clearly
indicates another meaning:
(1) "Addiction" or "alcoholism" means a primary, chronic, neurobiolog-
ical disease with genetic, psychosocial and environmental factors influenc-
ing its development and manifestations. It is characterized by behaviors
that include one (1) or more of the following: impaired control over drug or
alcohol use, compulsive use, continued use despite harm, and craving.
(2) "Adolescent" means an individual twelve (12) years through seven-
teen (17) years of age.
(3) "Adult" means an individual eighteen (18) years of age or older.
(2) (4) "Alcoholic" means a person who has the disease of alcoholism,
which is characterized by behaviors that include one (1) or more of the fol-
lowing: impaired control over alcohol use, compulsive use, continued use
despite harm, and craving.
(3) (5) "Approved private treatment facility" means a private agency
meeting the standards prescribed in section 39-305(1), Idaho Code, and ap-
proved under the provisions of section 39-305(3), Idaho Code, and rules pro-
mulgated by the board of health and welfare pursuant to this chapter.
(4) (6) "Approved public treatment facility" means a treatment agency
operating under the provisions of this chapter through a contract with the


department of health and welfare pursuant to section 39-304(7), Idaho Code,
and meeting the standards prescribed in section 39-305(1), Idaho Code, and
approved pursuant to section 39-305(3), Idaho Code, and rules promulgated by
the board of health and welfare pursuant to this chapter.
(7) "ASAM" means the manual of patient placement criteria for the
treatment of substance-related disorders published by the American society
of addiction medicine.
(5) (8) "Department" means the Idaho department of health and welfare.
(6) (9) "Director" means the director of the Idaho department of health
and welfare.
(7) (10) "Drug addict" means a person who has the disease of addiction,
which is characterized by behaviors that include one (1) or more of the fol-
lowing: impaired control over drug use, compulsive use, continued use de-
spite harm, and craving.
(11) "Eligibility screening" means the collection and review of in-
formation directly related to the individual's substance use and level of
functioning that the department uses to determine whether an individual is
eligible for adult or adolescent substance use disorder services available
through the department.
(12) "Idaho board of alcohol/drug counselor certification" or "IBADCC"
means an entity affiliated with the international certification reciprocity
consortium (ICRC) recognized by the department to oversee credentialing of
Idaho student of addiction studies and certified alcohol/drug counselors in
the state of Idaho.
(8) (13) "Incapacitated by alcohol or drugs" means that a person, as a
result of the use of alcohol or drugs, is unconscious or has his judgment oth-
erwise so impaired that he is incapable of realizing and making a rational
decision with respect to his need for treatment.
(9) (14) "Incompetent person" means a person who has been adjudged in-
competent by an appropriate court within this state.
(10) (15) "Intoxicated person" means a person whose mental or physical
functioning is substantially impaired as a result of the use of drugs or al-
cohol.
(16) "Licensed professional" means a person who holds an active license
or registration with the applicable jurisdiction for the profession and pro-
vides services within the practice authority for the applicable profession
consistent with the laws and regulations of the state where services are pro-
vided and consistent with the applicable standard of care.
(17) "National certification commission for addiction professionals"
or "NCCAP" means an entity recognized by the department to provide counselor
certification and endorsements in the state of Idaho.
(18) "Priority population" means individuals who receive services
ahead of other persons. Priority populations are determined yearly by the
department and align with federally mandated priorities.
(11) (19) "Recovery support services" means those ancillary, nonclin-
ical services needed for a client to maintain substance abuse or addiction
recovery. These services may include transportation, childcare, drug test-
ing, safe and sober housing and care management.
(12) (20) "Substance abuse" means the misuse or excessive use of alcohol
or other drugs or substances.


(13) (21) "Treatment" means the broad range of emergency, outpatient,
intensive outpatient, and inpatient services and care, including diagnostic
evaluation, medical, psychiatric, psychological, and social service care,
and vocational rehabilitation and career counseling, which may be extended
to alcoholics and intoxicated persons and/or drug addicts.
SECTION 4. That Chapter 3, Title 39, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 39-305A, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
39-305A. QUALIFIED SUBSTANCE USE DISORDERS PERSONNEL. Each behav-
ioral health program providing substance use disorders services shall
employ the number and variety of staff needed to provide the services and
treatments offered by the program as a multidisciplinary team. The program
shall employ at least one (1) qualified substance use disorders professional
for each behavioral health program location. For purposes of this section,
"qualified substance use disorders professional" means an IBADCC-certified
alcohol/drug counselor, an IBADCC-certified advanced alcohol/drug coun-
selor, a master addictions counselor certified by the national board for
certified counselors or the NCCAP, or a licensed professional.
SECTION 5. That Chapter 3, Title 39, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 39-305B, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
39-305B. QUALIFIED SUBSTANCE USE DISORDERS PROFESSIONAL
TRAINEES. (1) Prior to beginning work, a qualified substance use disorders
professional trainee practicing in the provision of substance use disorders
services shall possess either:
(a) A substance use disorder associate certification; or
(b) Formal documentation of current enrollment in a program for any li-
censed professional consistent with section 39-305A, Idaho Code.
(2) An individual who has completed a certification program described
in section 39-305A, Idaho Code, and is awaiting licensure may continue as a
qualified substance use disorders professional trainee at the same agency
for a period of six (6) months from the date of program completion.
SECTION 6. That Chapter 3, Title 39, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 39-305C, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
39-305C. WAIVER OF CRIMINAL HISTORY AND BACKGROUND CHECK. (1) Anyone
who receives an unconditional denial or a denial after an exemption review by
the department may apply for a behavioral health waiver to provide substance
use disorder treatment or recovery support services.
(2) A person seeking a waiver pursuant to subsection (1) of this sec-
tion may work or have access to participants only under supervision until the
waiver request is processed and approved.
SECTION 7. That Section 39-306, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.


SECTION 8. That Chapter 3, Title 39, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 39-306, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
39-306. ELIGIBILITY SCREENING -- CLINICAL ASSESSMENT -- ELIGIBILITY
DETERMINATION. (1) Individuals may access substance use disorder services
administered by the department through an eligibility screening. The eli-
gibility screening shall be directly related to the individual's substance-
related disorder and level of functioning, and shall include questions about
the individual's substance use, substance use history, and income and living
situation.
(2) Once an individual is found eligible for substance use disorder
services, the individual will be authorized to receive a clinical assessment
from a treatment provider in the department's substance use disorder ser-
vices network to determine ASAM level of care.
(3) The department may limit or prioritize adult or adolescent sub-
stance use disorder services, impose income limits, define eligibility
criteria, and establish the number of persons eligible based on such factors
as court-ordered services, availability of funding, the degree of financial
need, or the degree of clinical need. To be eligible for substance use disor-
der services, an individual must:
(a) Be an adult or adolescent with family income at or below federal
poverty guidelines established by the department;
(b) Be a resident of the state of Idaho;
(c) Be a member of a priority population;
(d) Meet diagnostic criteria for a substance-related disorder as de-
scribed in the DSM-5; and
(e) Meet specifications in each of the ASAM dimensions required for the
recommended level of care.
SECTION 9. That Chapter 3, Title 39, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 39-306A, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
39-306A. SELECTION OF SERVICE PROVIDERS. A participant who is eligi-
ble for substance use disorder services may choose a service provider that is
in the contracted substance use disorder provider network. Treatment ser-
vices must be within the recommended level of care according to ASAM based on
the individual's needs identified in the clinical assessment and resulting
individualized service plan.
SECTION 10. That Chapter 3, Title 39, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 39-306B, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
39-306B. RESIDENTIAL TREATMENT SERVICES. Any contractor with the de-
partment providing residential treatment services under this chapter must
be nationally accredited by the commission on accreditation of rehabilita-
tion facilities and have an ASAM level of care certification, which verifies
the program's capacity to deliver services consistent with level III ASAM
standards of care.


SECTION 11. That Section 39-309, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-309. PAYMENT FOR TREATMENT -- FINANCIAL ABILITY OF PATIENTS. (1) An
individual receiving substance use disorder services through the department
shall be responsible for paying for the services received. The financial re-
sponsibility for each service shall be based on the individual's ability to
pay as determined by the department.
(1) (2) If treatment is provided by an approved public treatment fa-
cility and the patient has not paid the charge therefor for the treatment,
the department is entitled to any income or payment received by the patient
or to which he may be entitled for the services rendered, and to any payment
from any public or private source available to the department because of the
treatment provided to the patient.
(2) (3) A patient in an approved treatment facility, or the estate of
the patient, or a person obligated to provide for the cost of treatment and
having sufficient financial ability, is liable to the department for the
cost of transportation, maintenance and treatment of the patient therein in
accordance with rates established by the department.
(3) (4) The board of health and welfare shall may adopt rules and reg-
ulations governing financial ability that take into consideration the in-
come, savings and other personal and real property of the person required to
pay, as well as any support being furnished by him to any person whom he may be
required by law to support.
SECTION 12. That Section 39-3122, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-3122. DEFINITIONS. (1) "Adult" means an individual eighteen (18)
years of age or older.
(2) "Applicant" means an adult who is seeking mental health services
through the department who has completed, or has had completed on the adult's
behalf, an application for mental health services.
(1) (3) "Behavioral health" means an integrated system for evaluation
and treatment of mental health and substance use disorders.
(4) "Department" means the Idaho department of health and welfare.
(5) "Eligibility screening" means the collection and review of infor-
mation directly related to the applicant's mental health and level of func-
tioning that the department uses to determine whether an applicant is eligi-
ble for adult mental heath services available through the department.
(2) (6) "Family support partner" means an individual who:
(a) Has lived experience caring for a child with a behavioral health di-
agnosis, mental illness or mental illness with a co-occurring substance
use disorder;
(b) Has specialized training related to such care; and
(c) Has successfully navigated the various systems of care.
(7) "Participant" means a person who is receiving mental health ser-
vices through the department.
(3) (8) "Peer support specialist" means an individual in recovery from
mental illness or mental illness with a co-occurring substance use disorder


who uses his or her lived experience and specialized training to assist other
individuals in their own recovery.
(4) (9) "Recovery coach" means an individual who has lived experience
of recovery from a substance use disorder or co-occurring mental illness,
either as a person in recovery or as a family member or significant other who
uses his or her lived experience and specialized training to assist other in-
dividuals in their own recovery.
(5) (10) "Region" means the administrative regions as defined by the de-
partment of health and welfare. Two (2) or more regions may consolidate for
the purposes of this chapter. For the purposes of this chapter, regions will
be consistent with judicial districts.
(11) "Serious mental illness" or "SMI" means any of the following psy-
chiatric illnesses as defined by the American psychiatric association in the
diagnostic and statistical manual of mental disorders (DSM-5-TR):
(a) Schizophrenia spectrum and other psychotic disorders;
(b) Bipolar disorders (mixed, manic, or depressive);
(c) Major depressive disorders (single episode or recurrent); or
(d) Obsessive-compulsive disorders.
(12) "Serious and persistent mental illness" or "SPMI" means a primary
diagnosis under DSM-5-TR of schizophrenia, schizoaffective disorder, bipo-
lar I disorder, bipolar II disorder, major depressive disorder recurrent
severe, delusional disorder, or psychotic disorder not otherwise specified
for a maximum of one hundred twenty (120) days without a conclusive diag-
nosis. The psychiatric disorder must be of sufficient severity to cause a
substantial disturbance in role performance or coping skills in at least two
(2) of the following functional areas in the last six (6) months:
(a) Vocational or educational;
(b) Financial;
(c) Social relationships or support;
(d) Family;
(e) Basic daily living skills;
(f) Housing;
(g) Community or legal; or
(h) Health or medical.
(6) (13) "Supportive services" means ancillary non-clinical
nonclinical services provided as part of community family support and
recovery support to promote and sustain the ability of individuals with
behavioral health disorders to live in the community and avoid institu-
tionalization. Supportive services include services provided by a family
support partner, peer support specialist or recovery coach.
SECTION 13. That Chapter 31, Title 39, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 39-3131A, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
39-3131A. ELIGIBILITY SCREENING. (1) Individuals may access adult
mental health services administered by the department through an eligibil-
ity screening. The eligibility screening must be directly related to the
participant's mental illness and level of functioning and based on the eli-
gibility criteria described in this section.


(2) The department may limit or prioritize mental health services, de-
fine eligibility criteria, or establish the number of persons eligible based
on such factors as court-ordered services, availability of funding, the de-
gree of financial need, or the degree of clinical need.
(3) To be eligible for voluntary mental health services pursuant to
section 39-3131, Idaho Code, an individual must:
(a) Be an adult;
(b) Be a resident of the state of Idaho; and
(c) Have a primary diagnosis of SMI or SPMI.
SECTION 14. That Chapter 31, Title 39, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 39-3141, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
39-3141. WAIVER OF BACKGROUND CHECK DENIAL. A certified individual
who is seeking to provide peer support specialist, family support partner,
or recovery coach services and receives an unconditional denial or a denial
after an exemption review by the department may apply for a behavioral health
waiver.
SECTION 15. The rules contained in IDAPA 16.07.17, Idaho Department of
Health and Welfare, relating to Substance Use Disorders Services, shall be
null, void, and of no force and effect on and after July 1, 2025.
SECTION 16. The rules contained in IDAPA 16.07.33, Idaho Department of
Health and Welfare, relating to Adult Mental Health Services, shall be null,
void, and of no force and effect on and after July 1, 2025.
SECTION 17. The rules contained in IDAPA 16.07.37, Idaho Department of
Health and Welfare, relating to Children's Mental Health Services, shall be
null, void, and of no force and effect on and after July 1, 2025.
SECTION 18. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.